New York, session 2025-2026, S7681.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 2859 to read as follows: 3 § 2859. Prohibition on retaining lobbyists. 1. Notwithstanding any 4 other law to the contrary, no state or local authority, or subsidiary 5 thereof, shall, directly or indirectly retain, contract, employ, or 6 designate a lobbyist to engage in lobbying. For the purposes of this 7 section, the terms "lobbyist" and "lobbying" shall have the meanings as 8 defined in section one-c of the legislative law. 9 2. Any contracts in effect at the time of the effective date of this 10 section, which are inconsistent with the provisions of this section, may 11 be cancelled or terminated by the public authority without incurring any 12 penalty or damages on account of such cancellation or termination, but 13 any monies owing by the public authority for work done prior to the 14 cancellation or termination shall be paid. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10929-01-5